Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-647
Cancer registry; certain data; confidential; access for research.

(1) All data obtained from medical records of individual patients is for the confidential use of the department and the private or public persons or entities that the department determines may view such records as provided in sections 81-663 to 81-675.

(2) The department may approve individuals or entities to obtain access to case-specific data or case-specific and patient-identifying data to assist in their research for prevention, cure, or control of cancer. Any information released from the cancer registry shall be disclosed as provided in sections 81-663 to 81-675.

(3) For purposes of protecting the public health, local health departments in Nebraska, health departments or cancer registries located outside Nebraska, and the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the National Cancer Institute of the United States Department of Health and Human Services or their successors may have access to the data contained in the cancer registry upon the department's approval based on the entity's written application.

Laws 1982, LB 212, § 6;

Laws 1986, LB 925, § 4;

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 72;

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 123;

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 117;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 111;

Laws 2007, LB185, § 48.